South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 11-50-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (E) The authority's Division of Local Government shall provide staff support and assistance for the South Carolina Infrastructure Facilities Authority as established in Chapter 40, Title 11, and the South Carolina Water Quality Revolving Fund Authority as established in Chapter 5, Title 48. SECTION 2.  Section 11-50-40(13) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (13) "Rural infrastructure project" means the acquisition, construction, installation, modification, renovation, repair, extension, renewal, replacement, or rehabilitation of land, interest in land, buildings, structures, facilities, or other improvements and the acquisition, installation, modification, renovation, repair, extension, renewal, replacement, rehabilitation, or furnishing of fixtures, machinery, equipment, furniture, or other property of any nature whatsoever used on, in, or in connection with any such land, interest in land, building, structure, facility, or other improvement, for the essential public purpose of providing environmental facilities and services to meet public health and environmental standards and to aid the development of trade, commerce, industry, agriculture, aquaculture, and employment opportunities, all of which must be primarily located in a county designated as distressed or least developed Tier III or IV pursuant to Section 12-6-3360 for 2009 in the year in which the loan or financial assistance is awarded, or located in a county with a project that otherwise meets the requirements of this item. A rural infrastructure project also includes water supply and aquaculture projects. SECTION 3.  Sections 1-11-25 and 1-11-26 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----